Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2454.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [136A.1245] LAW ENFORCEMENT GRANTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin To help recruit and retain law enforcement officers in the state, the office must establish a grant program to cover the cost of tuition and fees at public postsecondary educational institutions for students who satisfy the eligibility requirements under subdivision 3. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given: new text end new text begin (1) "gift aid" has the meaning given in section 136A.1465, subdivision 1, clause (2); new text end new text begin (2) "law enforcement agency" has the meaning given in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (f); new text end new text begin (3) "other expenses" has the meaning given in section 136A.1465, subdivision 1, clause (3); new text end new text begin (4) "peace officer" has the meaning given in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c); new text end new text begin (5) "public postsecondary educational institution" means an institution operated by the Board of Trustees of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities or the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota; new text end new text begin (6) "total and permanent duty disability" means a condition qualifying for benefits under section 353.656, subdivision 1a; and new text end new text begin (7) "tuition and fees" means the actual tuition and mandatory fees charged by the public postsecondary institution attended by the eligible student. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Eligibility. new text end new text begin (a) An individual is eligible for a grant under this section if the individual: new text end new text begin (1) applies in the form and manner specified by the office; new text end new text begin (2) is a resident student, as defined in section 136A.101, subdivision 8; new text end new text begin (3) is a graduate of a secondary school or its equivalent, or is 17 years of age or older and has met all requirements for admission as a student to a public postsecondary educational institution; new text end new text begin (4) has completed the Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) or the state aid application; new text end new text begin (5) is enrolled in at least one credit per fall, spring, or summer semester in an undergraduate certificate, diploma, or degree program at a public postsecondary educational institution; new text end new text begin (6) has not (i) obtained a baccalaureate degree, or (ii) been enrolled for 12 semesters or the equivalent, excluding courses taken that qualify as developmental education or below college-level and are subject to subdivision 5, paragraph (b); new text end new text begin (7) is not in default, as defined by the office, for any federal or state student educational loan; new text end new text begin (8) is not more than 30 days in arrears in court-ordered child support that is collected or enforced by the public authority responsible for child support enforcement or, is more than 30 days in arrears in court-ordered child support that is collected or enforced by the public authority responsible for child support enforcement, but is complying with a written payment agreement under section 518A.69 or order for arrearages; new text end new text begin (9) has not been convicted of or pled nolo contendere or guilty to a crime involving fraud in obtaining federal Title IV funds within the meaning of Code of Federal Regulations, title 34, section 668.32; new text end new text begin (10) is meeting satisfactory academic progress as defined in section 136A.101, subdivision 10; and new text end new text begin (11) is either: new text end new text begin (i) a peace officer employed by a Minnesota law enforcement agency; new text end new text begin (ii) the dependent child of a peace officer employed by a Minnesota law enforcement agency; or new text end new text begin (iii) the dependent child of an individual who, while employed by a Minnesota law enforcement agency as a peace officer, suffered a total and permanent duty disability. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), clause (5), an individual who is eligible for a grant under paragraph (a), clause (11), item (i), must be enrolled in at least one credit per fall, spring, or summer semester in an undergraduate baccalaureate degree program at a public postsecondary educational institution in the field of criminal justice, law enforcement, or a similar field. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Award amount. new text end new text begin (a) Scholarships must be awarded to eligible students in an amount equal to 100 percent of tuition and fees after gift aid is deducted. new text end new text begin (b) If there is a projected shortfall in available resources, the commissioner may proportionately reduce awards to keep spending within available resources. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Duration of grant. new text end new text begin (a) Each scholarship is for a period of one semester or equivalent term. A scholarship may be renewed if the eligible student continues to meet the conditions of eligibility. A grant award is terminated upon failure to meet the eligibility requirements under subdivision 3. new text end new text begin (b) A student is entitled to an additional semester or the equivalent of grant eligibility if the student withdraws from enrollment: new text end new text begin (1) for active military service because the student was ordered to active military service as defined in section 190.05, subdivision 5b or 5c; new text end new text begin (2) for a serious health condition, while under the care of a medical professional, that substantially limits the student's ability to complete the term; or new text end new text begin (3) while providing care that substantially limits the student's ability to complete the term to the student's spouse, child, or parent who has a serious health condition. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Administration. new text end new text begin (a) The office must determine the time and manner of grant applications. The office must require an applicant to provide documentation verifying that the applicant meets the eligibility criteria under subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clause (11). new text end new text begin (b) The scholarship must be paid directly to the eligible institution where the student is enrolled. new text end new text begin (c) The office must prepare promotional and informational materials about the grant program under this section and disseminate the materials to law enforcement agencies throughout the state. The office and the Board of Peace Officer Standards and Training may collaborate on promotion of the program. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; LAW ENFORCEMENT GRANTS.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Office of Higher Education for law enforcement grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 136A.1245. new text end